District of Columbia statutes.
25-315

Additional considerations for renewal of licenses.

(a)

If proper notice has been given, as provided in subchapter II of Chapter 4, and no objection to the appropriateness of the establishment is filed, the establishment shall be presumed to be appropriate for the locality, section, or portion of the District where it is located.

(b)

(1)

The Board shall consider the licensee’s record of compliance with this title and the regulations promulgated under this title and any conditions placed on the license during the period of licensure, including the terms of a settlement agreement.

(2)

The Board shall prepare a check sheet documenting the licensee’s compliance. This check sheet shall be available to the public for review.

(c)

If an application for license renewal is made the subject of contested proceedings and the license expires before the Board’s decision on the renewal application, the Board may extend the expiration date during the pendency of the decision on the renewal application.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(j), 60 DCR 3410

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-313, § 25-316, and § 25-433.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-315.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 substituted “settlement agreement” for “voluntary agreement” in (b)(1).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of (b)(1), see § 2(j) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(j) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).